Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2510
Qualified electors, defined.

Qualified electors shall mean all persons registered to vote, at the time the prospective petition is filed, in the jurisdiction governed or to be governed by any measure sought to be enacted by initiative, or altered or repealed by referendum.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 10.